Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.160

Minimum purchase requirement in exercise of subscription rights permitted.

Any person exercising subscription rights to purchase capital stock may be required to purchase a minimum of up to twenty-five shares to the extent the shares are available (but the aggregate price for any minimum share purchase shall not exceed five hundred dollars).

[ 1981 c 85 s 31.]